Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.465

Comprehensive performance audit of state printing services.

By November 1, 2016, building on the findings of the 2011 audit, the state auditor shall conduct a comprehensive performance audit of state printing services in accordance with RCW 43.09.470. Following the audit in 2016, the state auditor shall conduct follow-up audits as deemed necessary to ensure effective implementation of chapter 43, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 310.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.